Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1729
Sheriff; personnel director; duties.

The sheriff of each county under sections 23-1721 to 23-1736 shall be the personnel director of the merit system. The personnel director shall act as secretary of the sheriff's office merit commission and shall advise the commission in all matters pertaining to the merit system established by sections 23-1721 to 23-1736.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 9, p. 645;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 7.